Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.150

Costs—Funding staff support—Rules.

(1) All costs incurred by the department, including the adoption of rules and other actions necessary to carry out this chapter, shall be reimbursed by the commission.

(2) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards or commissions in accordance with RCW 43.23.033 if a position is not directly funded by the legislature and costs are related to the specific activity undertaken on behalf of an individual commodity board or commission. The commission shall provide funds to the department according to the rules adopted by the director.

[ 2006 c 330 s 18.]